Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-310.01
Assault by strangulation or suffocation; penalty; affirmative defense.

(1) A person commits the offense of assault by strangulation or suffocation if the person knowingly and intentionally:

(a) Impedes the normal breathing or circulation of the blood of another person by applying pressure on the throat or neck of the other person; or

(b) Impedes the normal breathing of another person by covering the mouth and nose of the person.

(2) An offense is committed under this section regardless of whether a visible injury resulted.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a violation of this section is a Class IIIA felony.

(4) A violation of this section is a Class IIA felony if:

(a) The person used or attempted to use a dangerous instrument while committing the offense;

(b) The person caused serious bodily injury to the other person while committing the offense; or

(c) The person has been previously convicted:

(i) Of a violation of this section; or

(ii) In any other state or federal court of a criminal offense with essentially the same elements as a violation of this section.

(5) It is an affirmative defense that an act constituting strangulation or suffocation was the result of a legitimate medical procedure.

Laws 2004, LB 943, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB141, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 6.
July 18, 2026